Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-404.01
Arrest without warrant; supplemental provisions.

The provisions of sections 29-404.01 to 29-404.03 shall be supplemental and in addition to any other laws relating to the subject of arrest.

Laws 1967, c. 172, § 1, p. 487.